District of Columbia statutes.
38-1208.02

Establishment of the Office of Vocational Education and Skills Training at the University of the District of Columbia.

(a)

Pursuant to § 1-204.04(b), the Council establishes an Office of Vocational Education and Skills Training under the President of the University of the District of Columbia.

(b)

VEST shall be responsible for the oversight and coordination of all government-sponsored vocational education, adult apprenticeship, and workforce skills training performed by UDC and DCPS.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title VIII, § 802
as added Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2202, 49 DCR 6968